Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1323
Public improvement; furnishing labor or material; certificate that equipment has been assessed.

Every person, partnership, limited liability company, association, or corporation furnishing labor or material in the repair, alteration, improvement, erection, or construction of any public improvement shall furnish a certified statement to be attached to the contract that all equipment to be used on the project, except that acquired since the assessment date, has been assessed for taxation for the current year, giving the county where assessed.

Laws 1963, c. 436, § 1, p. 1453;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 496.